Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-214
Research and extension
centers;
control; employees; compensation.

The Board of
Regents shall have control and supervision of the research and extension centers established
by sections 85-201 and 85-206 and shall appoint skillful superintendents
and such other employees as to it appears necessary to obtain the best results.
The board shall fix the salaries and compensation of employees and establish
such rules and regulations as it may from time to time deem best.

Laws 1903, c. 114, § 3, p. 591;

Laws 1909, c. 143, § 3, p. 501;

Laws 1909, c. 144, § 3, p. 503;

R.S.1913, § 7145;

C.S.1922, § 6795;

Laws 1929, c. 15, § 2, p. 96;

C.S.1929, § 85-211;

R.S.1943, § 85-214;

Laws 1959, c. 461, § 1, p. 1529;

Laws 1991, LB 663, § 82;

Laws 2011, LB334, § 7.